src/fst/affixes/symbols.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Symbol affixes

LEXICON Symbols
 +N+Symbol: # ;
 
LEXICON Noun_symbols_possibly_inflected
 +N+Symbol:0 SYMBOL_connector ;

LEXICON Noun_symbols_never_inflected
 +N+Symbol:0 # ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_connector
            0  SYMBOL_NO_suff ; ! §
        0 :%'  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §'a
 +Err/Orth:%:  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §:a
 +Err/Orth:0   SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §a
 +Err/Orth:%-  SYMBOL_suff    ; ! §-a

LEXICON SYMBOL_NO_suff
+Sg:0 # ;

LEXICON SYMBOL_suff
+I+Pl:a # ;
+A+Obv:a # ;
+A+Pl:ak # ;
+Loc:ihk # ;
+Pl+Eng:s # ;
